Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 2. Agricultural Cooperative Associations.
§ 13.1-329.
Marketing contracts; enforcement; inducing breach; spreading false reports.

An association and its members may make and execute marketing contracts, requiring the members to sell, for any period of time, not over ten years, all or any specified part of their agricultural products or specified commodities exclusively to or through the association or any facilities to be created by the association. The contract may provide that the association may sell or resell the products delivered by its members, with or without taking title thereto, and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all necessary selling overhead, and other costs and expenses, including (a) interest or dividends on its preferred stock, not exceeding eight per centum per annum, (b) reserves for retiring the stock, if any, (c) other proper reserves, and (d) interest or dividends not exceeding eight per centum per annum upon common stock.

The bylaws and the marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member or stockholder to the association upon the breach by him of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products; and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premium for bonds, expenses and fees in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association; and any such provision shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth.

In the event of any such breach or threatened breach of such marketing contract by a member, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent further breach of the contract, and to a decree of specific performance thereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action, and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

Any person who knowingly induces any member or stockholder of an association or corporation organized hereunder to breach his marketing contract with the association or corporation shall be liable to the association or corporation for the full amount of damages sustained by it by reason of such breach; and any person who maliciously and knowingly spreads false reports about the finances or management of any such association or corporation shall be liable to the association or corporation aggrieved in a civil suit for the actual damage which it may sustain by reason of such false reports, and also in the penal sum of $500 for each such act, which may be recovered in the same action.

Any person, firm or corporation conducting a public tobacco warehouse within this Commonwealth who knowingly solicits or permits any member of any association organized hereunder to breach his marketing contract with the association by selling, offering for sale, or displaying for sale or for auction such member’s products contrary to the terms of any marketing agreement of which such person or any member of such firm or any active officer or manager of such corporation has knowledge or notice, shall be liable to the association aggrieved in a civil suit in the penal sum of not less than $100 nor more than $500 for each such offense; and such association shall be entitled to an injunction against such person, firm or corporation, to prevent further breaches and a multiplicity of actions thereon. In addition, such person, firm or corporation shall pay to the association a reasonable attorney’s fee and all costs involved in any such litigation or proceedings at law. Provided, however, that no such action or suit by such an association shall lie unless there has been first served upon such person, firm or corporation after such tobacco has been delivered to the warehouse, and prior to the sale thereof, a notice, in writing, stating that the products of a member of such association are about to be sold, offered for sale or displayed for sale. Such notice may be served by any peace officer or any other person, and the affidavit of the person serving the same shall be prima facie evidence of such service. It shall be the duty of any police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable or deputy constable of this Commonwealth to serve such notice upon request of any authorized representative of the association, and upon the payment of a fee of fifty cents for each such service.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-278, 13-279; 1956, c. 428.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Warehouses and Warehousemen, § 3.

§ 13.1-330.
Recordation of marketing contracts.

Whenever any body of agricultural producers, cooperative corporation composed of agricultural producers or cooperative marketing association incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth, or under the laws of any other state of the United States and licensed to do business in this Commonwealth, which is engaged in marketing agricultural products, other than leguminous food products, for its members shall prepare and deliver to the clerk of any court in this Commonwealth in the office of whom deeds are admitted to record, a book to be called “the contract book of . . . . . . . . . . .” (namely the body, corporation or association), such book shall thereupon become a public record book of such clerk’s office, and it shall be the duty of such clerk to record therein the matters and things authorized by the succeeding section.

At any time after any such book shall have been so delivered to the clerk as provided herein, the body, corporation or association which has delivered the same may request the clerk to whom such book has been delivered to record therein any marketing contracts or agreements which have been entered into by such body, corporation or association and any members thereof; provided, however, that if any such contracts or agreements be in the same words and figures as any other contracts or agreements with any other members of the body, corporation or association, and be separately signed by such members of the body, corporation or association, such body, corporation or association may have one of such contracts or agreements recorded in extenso in such book, and may furnish the clerk with a list of the names of persons appearing on such contracts as signers thereof, with the dates of the signatures respectively, whereupon the clerk shall record such names as signers of such contracts or agreements, with the dates of their signatures, respectively, so furnished. Such recordation of the list of signers so furnished shall be equivalent to the recordation in extenso of the contract or agreement of each signer thereon. Such copy of such contract or agreement and such list of names of persons appearing on such contracts as signers thereof shall be sworn to by some officer of the body, corporation or association cognizant of the facts before some officer authorized to take acknowledgments to deeds. But in no case shall any such contract or agreement be deemed to be recorded as to any signer thereof until his name shall be indexed in such book by the clerk, which indexing the clerk is hereby required to do.

When the provisions of the two preceding subsections shall have been complied with, and any such recordation as is therein mentioned is made in the county in which is situated the land on which the produce covered by the particular marketing contract or agreement concerned is grown or produced, such recordation shall operate as constructive notice of the existence of such contract or agreement, and of the terms thereof, and all persons contracting or dealing with any such member in relation to any such produce covered by such contract or agreement shall be bound thereby; and all rights or liens acquired by any such person in such produce subsequent to the date of such recordation shall be subject in all respects to the rights of the body, corporation or association under such contract or agreement; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall affect the statutory lien of a landlord for advances made to a tenant, or for rent; and provided, also, that nothing herein contained shall affect a bona fide purchaser of any agricultural product, upon the floor of any public warehouse, when such purchaser is without actual notice of the rights of the body, corporation or association under such contract or agreement nor a warehouseman selling such products at public auction on his warehouse floor, without actual notice of such contract or agreement.

For making the recordations authorized by this section, the clerk shall be entitled to the following fees, to be paid by the body, corporation or association for which the service is performed: for recording a contract or agreement in extenso, the same fees as for recording a deed; for recording a sworn list of names when furnished as above provided, two cents for each person. No tax shall be charged on the recordations authorized hereby.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-280 to 13-283; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-331.
Associations are not in restraint of trade.

No association complying with the terms hereof shall be deemed to be a conspiracy, or a combination in restraint of trade, or an illegal monopoly; or be deemed to have been formed for the purpose of lessening competition or fixing prices arbitrarily, nor shall the contracts between the association and its members, or any agreements authorized in this Act, be construed as an unlawful restraint of trade, or as a part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose or act.

An association may acquire, exchange, interpret and disseminate to its members, to other cooperative associations, and otherwise, past, present and prospective crop, market, statistical, economic and other similar information relating to the business of the association, either directly or through an agent created or selected by it or by other associations acting in conjunction with it.

An association may advise its members in respect to the adjustment of their current and prospective production of agricultural commodities and its relation to the prospective volume of consumption, selling prices and existing or potential surplus, to the end that every market may be served from the most convenient productive areas under a program of orderly marketing that will assure adequate supplies without undue enhancement of prices or the accumulation of any undue surplus.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-284; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-332.
Voluntary dissolution.

The members of an association may at any regular meeting or any special meeting called for the purpose, upon thirty days’ notice of the time, place and object of the meeting having been given as prescribed in the bylaws, by two-thirds of the voting power voting thereon, discontinue the operations of the association and direct that the association be dissolved and its affairs settled. The meeting shall by like vote designate a committee of three who, as trustees on behalf of the association and within the time fixed in their designation or any extension thereof, shall liquidate its assets, pay its debts and divide any surplus among the members in accordance with their respective rights and interests under their contracts with the association and the articles of incorporation and bylaws. A report of the proceedings had under this section, together with a list of the names and residences of the directors and officers of the association, and the names and residences of the trustees appointed, certified by the president and the secretary, shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the Commission. The Commission, upon being satisfied that the requirements of law have been complied with, shall issue a certificate of dissolution, and thereupon the association shall stand dissolved and the trustees shall proceed to settle up and adjust its business and affairs.

Whenever all the members shall consent in writing to the dissolution and the appointment of three trustees for winding up the affairs of the association, no meeting or notice thereof shall be necessary, but on filing such consent with the Commission, it shall issue a certificate of dissolution, and the association shall stand dissolved and the said trustees shall proceed to settle up and adjust its business and affairs.

Whenever a certificate of dissolution has been issued by the Commission, it shall certify one copy of the certificate to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services and one copy to the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division.

The trustees may bring and defend all actions by them deemed necessary to protect and enforce the rights of the association.

Any vacancies in the trusteeship may be filled by the remaining trustees.

In the case of an association dissolving pursuant to this section, the circuit court of the county or the circuit, corporation, or other court having equitable jurisdiction in the city where its principal office is located, upon petition of the trustees or a majority of them, or in a proper case upon the petition of a creditor or member, or upon the petition of the Attorney General upon notice to all of the trustees and to such other interested persons as the court may specify, from time to time may order and adjudge in respect to the following matters:

The giving of notice by publication or otherwise of the time and place for the presentation of all claims and demands against the association, which notice may require all creditors of and claimants against the association to present in writing and in detail at the place specified their respective accounts and demands to the trustees by a day therein specified, which shall not be less than forty days from the service or first publication of such notice;

The payment or satisfaction in whole or in part of claims and demands against the association, or the retention of moneys for such purpose;

The presentation and filing of intermediate and final accounts of the trustees, the hearing thereon, the allowance or disallowance thereof, and the discharge of the trustees, or any of them, from their duties and liabilities;

The administration of any trust or the disposition of any property held in trust by or for the association;

The sale and disposition of any remaining property of the association and the distribution or division of such property or its proceeds among the members or persons entitled thereto;

Such matters as justice may require.All such orders and judgments shall be binding upon the association, its property and assets, its trustees, members, creditors and all persons having claims against it.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-333.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 465.

Cross references.

For present similar section, see now §

13.1-333.1

.

§ 13.1-333.1.
Annual reports.

Each association subject to this chapter within six months after the close of its fiscal year shall transmit to each of its members an annual report containing the name of the association, its place of business, a general statement of its business operations during the fiscal year, showing the amount of capital stock paid up and the number of stockholders, if a stock corporation, or the number of members and the amount of the membership fees received, if a nonstock association; an income and expense statement; and its balance sheet.
Any association audited by a certified public accountant may comply with this section by transmitting a copy of such audit to its members.

The term “transmit,” as used in this section, may be satisfied by printing the annual report or audit in an official publication of the association.

History.

1989, c. 465.

§ 13.1-334.
Application to existing associations.

This Act shall be applicable to any existing association formed under or which has adopted the provisions of the Agricultural Cooperative Association Act, Chapter 15, Title 13, as heretofore amended, and all such associations shall have and may exercise and enjoy all the rights, privileges, authority, powers and capacity granted or afforded under and in pursuance of this Act and shall be subject to all restrictions and requirements of this Act to the same extent and effect as though organized hereunder.

Any agricultural cooperative marketing or purchasing association organized as a corporation under the laws of this Commonwealth may bring itself under and within the terms of this Act as if organized hereunder and may thereafter operate in pursuance of the terms hereof, and may exercise and enjoy all the rights, privileges, authority, powers and capacity granted or afforded under and in pursuance of this Act and shall be subject to all restrictions, limitations and requirements of this Act to the same extent and effect as though organized hereunder, by filing in triplicate with the Commission, articles of adoption signed by its president or one of the vice-presidents, under the seal of the corporation, attested by its secretary and acknowledged by them before an officer authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to take acknowledgments of deeds, certifying that by resolution of the board of directors of such association duly adopted, such association has elected to bring itself within the terms of this Act. If the Commission finds that the articles comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall by order issue a certificate of adoption, which shall be admitted to record in its office. Upon the issuance of such certificate, it shall become effective in accordance with its terms. One original counterpart of the articles of adoption, together with the certificate of adoption issued by the Commission, shall be certified by the Commission to the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services for filing and another counterpart shall be certified to the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division for filing.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-335.
Saving clause.

This Act shall not impair or affect any act done, offense committed or right accruing, accrued or acquired, or liability, penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred prior to the time this Act takes effect, but the same may be enjoyed, asserted, enforced, prosecuted or inflicted as fully and to the same extent as if this Act had not been passed. This Act shall not impair or affect any contract entered into by any association prior to the time this Act takes effect.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-336.
Limitations of the use of the word “cooperative.”

No person, firm, corporation or association, domestic or foreign, hereafter commencing business in this Commonwealth shall use the word “cooperative” or any abbreviation thereof, as a part of its corporate or business name unless it has complied with the provisions of this Act or some other statute of this Commonwealth relating to cooperative associations. A foreign association organized under and complying with the cooperative law of the state of such association’s creation shall be entitled to use of term “cooperative” in this Commonwealth if it has obtained the privilege of doing business in this Commonwealth under any cooperative statute of this Commonwealth. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding fifty dollars. For the purpose of this section, each day’s violation may be considered a separate offense.

Subsection A shall not apply to a corporation or association, domestic or foreign, whose purpose is to promote housing opportunities or to represent, coordinate and further the purposes of groups organized to construct, operate, or promote housing, and such corporation or association may use the term “cooperative” as part of its corporate or other business name or title.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-289; 1956, c. 428; 1993, c. 822.

§ 13.1-337.
Foreign associations.

A foreign corporation that can qualify as an association, as defined in §

13.1-313

, may be authorized to do business in this Commonwealth under the provisions of this Act by complying with the laws relating to foreign corporations doing business in the Commonwealth and filing with the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services and the Director of the State Agricultural Extension Division, a copy of its charter duly certified by the Commission. It shall pay the same fees and charges as domestic associations. Upon such compliance, it shall have all the rights and privileges of like domestic associations and the entrance fee shall be computed as if a charter fee.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-290; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564.

§ 13.1-338.
Purchasing business of other associations, persons, firms or corporations; stock issued.

Whenever an association organized hereunder with preferred capital stock shall purchase the stock or any property, or any interest in any property of any person, firm or corporation or association, it may by agreement with the other party or parties to the transaction discharge the obligation so incurred, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired interest shares of its preferred capital stock to an amount which at par value would equal a fair market value of the stock or interest so purchased, as determined by the board of directors. In that case the transfer to the association of the stock or interest purchased shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock issued.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-285; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-339.
Merger or consolidation.

Associations shall have the power to merge or consolidate with any other like associations. Such merger or consolidation shall be effected in accordance with the general provisions of law providing for the merger or consolidation of other corporations insofar as applicable, and where not applicable in a manner analogous to that set forth in said provisions. In effecting such merger or consolidation, two-thirds of the members voting thereon at any regular meeting, or special meeting called for the purpose, shall take such action as is required of stockholders. The fair cash value of the stock or membership of any dissenting member shall be taken to mean the amount to which said member would be entitled by way of distribution of assets if said association were dissolved.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-259; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-340.
Sale, mortgage or other disposition of assets.

The sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of an association, when made in the usual and regular course of the business of the association, may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any other corporation, domestic or foreign, as shall be authorized by its board of directors; and in such case no authorization or consent of the members shall be required.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a mortgage or pledge of all or any part of the property and assets, with or without the goodwill, of an association, though not made in usual and regular course of its business, may be made for money upon such terms and conditions as shall be authorized by its board of directors and no authorization or consent of members shall be required.

A sale, lease or exchange, or a mortgage or pledge for a consideration other than money, of all, or substantially all, the property and assets, with or without the goodwill, of an association, if not made in the usual and regular course of its business, may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any other corporation, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the following manner:

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members having voting rights, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of the association shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, at least ten days prior to such meeting. At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the association therefor. Such authorization shall require the vote of at least two-thirds of the votes entitled to be cast by members present or represented by proxy at such meeting. After such authorization by a vote of members, the board of directors, nevertheless in its discretion, may abandon such sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of assets, subject to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating thereto, without further action or approval by members.

History.

1956, c. 428.

Law Review.

For note on the Virginia Takeover Act and SEC Tender Offer Rule 14d-2(b).

see 22 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 487 (1981).

§ 13.1-341.
Taxes.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as exempting any association from the payment of license, income, property or other taxes, state and local; and the designation of any such association in this article as nonprofit shall not be construed as exempting it from state income taxation, notwithstanding any other provision of law. For the privilege of storing or marketing agricultural products, an association shall, however, pay only an annual license fee of ten dollars which shall be in lieu of all other corporation, franchise and income taxes, taxes on capital, taxes and charges upon reserves held by the association, and all state and local license taxes on that part of its business which is solely and exclusively the storing or marketing of agricultural products. Marketing of agricultural products shall include the functions involved in transferring title and in moving goods from producer to consumer, including buying, selling, processing, packing, storing, transporting, standardizing, financing, risk bearing and supplying market information.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-291; 1956, c. 428; 1982, c. 266.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Licenses, § 23.

§ 13.1-342.
Reserved.

§ 13.1-343.
Application of general corporation laws.

The provisions of the Virginia Stock Corporation Act (§

13.1-601

et seq.) and of the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.) shall, to the extent that they are not in conflict with or inconsistent with the provisions of this Act, apply to associations subject to this Act, each of which shall establish and maintain a registered office and a registered agent and file the annual reports required by such Acts.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-250; 1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-344.
Existing associations continued.

All associations organized under or that have adopted the provisions of Chapter 15, Title 13, as heretofore amended, which are in existence at the date of the enactment of this Act, shall continue in existence subject to the terms of this Act.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-345.
Verification no longer required; signing instrument containing misstatement as perjury.

A requirement in this chapter that an instrument be verified by oath need not be complied with after July 1, 1958. A person who signs any instrument delivered to the Commission as required by this chapter knowing it to contain a misstatement of fact shall be guilty of perjury.

History.

1958, c. 564.